Alaska statutes. Title 36. Public Contracts.
Article 2. Competitive Sealed Bidding.

Administrative Code. —

For competitive sealed bidding; multi-step bidding, see 2 AAC 12, art. 3.

Collateral references. —

Right of municipal corporation to recover back from contractor payments made under contract violating competitive bidding statute.
33 ALR3d 397.

Sec. 36.30.100.
General policy.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, or unless specifically exempted by law, an agency contract shall be awarded by competitive sealed bidding.

[Repealed, § 48 ch 137 SLA 1996.]

[Repealed, § 20 ch 102 SLA 1989.]

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 20 ch 102 SLA 1989; am § 7 ch 2 FSSLA 1992; am § 48 ch 137 SLA 1996)

Cross references. —

For waiver of public bid requirements in areas affected by declared disasters, see AS

44.33.300

.

Administrative Code. —

For source selection, see 2 AAC 12, art. 1.

Collateral references. —

Requirement that public contract be awarded on competitive bidding as applicable to contract for public utility. 81 ALR3d 979.

Sec. 36.30.110.
Invitation to bid.

When competitive sealed bidding is used, the procurement officer shall issue an invitation to bid. It must include a time, place, and date by which the bid must be received, purchase description, and a description of all contractual terms and conditions applicable to the procurement.

The bidder shall have a valid Alaska business license at the time the contract is awarded. To qualify as an Alaska bidder under AS

36.30.321

, a bidder shall have a valid Alaska business license at the time designated in the invitation to bid for bid opening. A bidder for a construction contract shall also submit proof of the bidder’s registration under AS 08.18 before the contract may be awarded.

If the commissioner of transportation and public facilities makes a written finding that the release of the estimated cost of a construction contract would adversely affect the state’s ability to obtain the best competitive bid, the estimated cost is confidential information and may not be released to the public before bid opening.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am §§ 2, 3 ch 102 SLA 1989; am § 12 ch 59 SLA 2013)

Administrative Code. —

For competitive sealed bidding; multistep bidding, see 2 AAC 12, art. 3.

Sec. 36.30.115.
Subcontractors for construction contracts.

Within five working days after the identification of the apparent low bidder for a construction contract, the apparent low bidder shall submit a list of the subcontractors the bidder proposes to use in the performance of the construction contract. The list must include the name and location of the place of business for each subcontractor, evidence of each subcontractor’s valid Alaska business license, and evidence of each subcontractor’s registration as a contractor under AS 08.18. If a subcontractor on the list did not have a valid Alaska business license and a valid certificate of registration as a contractor under AS 08.18 at the time the bid was opened, the bidder may not use the subcontractor in the performance of the contract, and shall replace the subcontractor with a subcontractor who had a valid Alaska business license and a valid certificate of registration as a contractor under AS 08.18 at the time the bid was opened.

A construction contractor or the apparent low bidder for a construction contract may replace a listed subcontractor if the subcontractor

fails to comply with AS 08.18;

files for bankruptcy or becomes insolvent;

fails to execute a contract with the construction contractor or bidder involving performance of the work for which the subcontractor was listed and the construction contractor or bidder acted in good faith;

fails to obtain bonding;

fails to obtain insurance acceptable to the state;

fails to perform the contract with the construction contractor or bidder involving work for which the subcontractor was listed;

must be substituted in order for the contractor to satisfy required state and federal affirmative action requirements;

refuses to agree or abide with the labor agreement of the construction contractor or bidder; or

is determined by the procurement officer not to be a responsible subcontractor.

If a bidder for a construction contract fails to list a subcontractor or lists more than one subcontractor for the same portion of work and the value of that work is in excess of half of one percent of the total bid, the bidder shall be considered to have agreed to perform that portion of work without the use of a subcontractor and to have represented the bidder to be qualified to perform that work.

A bidder for a construction contract who attempts to circumvent the requirements of this section by listing as a subcontractor another contractor who, in turn, sublets the majority of the work required under the contract violates this section.

If a construction contract is awarded to a bidder who violates this section, the procurement officer may

cancel the contract; or

after notice and a hearing, assess a penalty on the bidder in an amount that does not exceed 10 percent of the value of the subcontract at issue.

In addition to the circumstances described in (b) of this section, a construction contractor may request permission from the procurement officer to add or replace a listed subcontractor. The request must be in writing, specifically detailing the basis for the request, and include appropriate supporting documentation. The procurement officer shall approve the request if the procurement officer determines in writing that the requested addition or replacement is in the best interest of the state.

The requirements of this section do not apply to a design-build construction contract.

In this section, “construction contractor” means a person who enters into a construction contract with an agency.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am §§ 4, 5 ch 65 SLA 1987; am § 2 ch 163 SLA 1988; am § 4 ch 102 SLA 1989; am § 12 ch 137 SLA 1996; am §§ 1, 2 ch 35 SLA 1999; am § 37 ch 134 SLA 2003)

Sec. 36.30.120.
Bid security.

Bid security shall be required for all competitive sealed bidding for construction contracts when the price is estimated by the procurement officer to exceed an amount established by regulation of the commissioner. Bid security on construction contracts under the amount set by the commissioner may be required when the circumstances warrant. Bid security may be required for competitive sealed bidding for contracts for supplies, services, or professional services in accordance with regulations of the commissioner when needed for the protection of the state.

Bid security must be a bond provided by a surety company authorized to do business in the state or otherwise supplied in a form satisfactory to the commissioner. Bid security must be in an amount equal to at least five percent of the amount of the bid.

When the invitation to bid requires security, the procurement officer shall reject a bid that does not comply with the bid security requirement unless, in accordance with regulations, the officer determines that the bid fails to comply in a nonsubstantial manner with the security requirements.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 5 ch 102 SLA 1989)

Sec. 36.30.130.
Public notice of invitation to bid.

The procurement officer shall give adequate public notice of the invitation to bid at least 21 days before the date for the opening of bids. If the procurement officer determines in writing that a shorter notice period is advantageous for a particular bid and adequate competition is anticipated, the 21-day period may be shortened. Notice shall be posted on the Alaska Online Public Notice System (AS

44.62.175

). The time and manner of notice must be in accordance with regulations adopted by the commissioner of administration. When practicable, notice may include

publication in a newspaper calculated to reach prospective bidders; and

notices posted in public places within the area where the work is to be performed or the material furnished.

Failure to comply with the notice requirements of this section does not invalidate a bid or the award of a contract. If the state fails to substantially comply with the requirements of (a) of this section, the state is liable for damages caused by that failure.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am §§ 2, 3 ch 59 SLA 1994; am §§ 13, 47 ch 137 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 54 SLA 2000; am § 13 ch 59 SLA 2013)

Administrative Code. —

For competitive sealed bidding; multistep bidding, see 2 AAC 12, art. 3.

Sec. 36.30.140.
Bid opening.

The procurement officer shall open bids at the time and place designated in the invitation to bid. All bid openings are open to the public. The amount of each bid and other relevant information that is specified by regulation of the commissioner, together with the name of each bidder, shall be recorded.

The information recorded under (a) of this section is open to public inspection as soon as practicable before the notice of intent to award a contract is given under AS

36.30.365

. The bids are not open for public inspection until after the notice of intent to award a contract is given. To the extent the bidder designates and the procurement officer concurs, trade secrets and other proprietary data contained in a bid document are confidential.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 6 ch 65 SLA 1987)

Administrative Code. —

For competitive sealed bidding; multistep bidding, see 2 AAC 12, art. 3.

For innovative procurement, see 2 AAC 12, art. 11.

Sec. 36.30.150.
Bid acceptance and bid evaluation.

Bids shall be unconditionally accepted without alteration or correction, except as authorized in AS

36.30.160

. The procurement officer shall evaluate bids based on the requirements set out in the invitation to bid, which may include criteria to determine acceptability such as inspection, testing, quality, delivery, and suitability for a particular purpose. The criteria that will affect the bid price and be considered in evaluation for award must be objectively measurable, such as discounts, transportation costs, and total or life cycle costs. The invitation to bid must set out the evaluation criteria to be used. Criteria may not be used in bid evaluation if they are not set out in the invitation to bid.

[Repealed, § 11 ch 37 SLA 1993.]

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 11 ch 37 SLA 1993)

Administrative Code. —

For competitive sealed bidding; multistep bidding, see 2 AAC 12, art. 3.

Sec. 36.30.160.
Late bids; correction or withdrawal of bids; cancellation of awards.

Bids received after the bid due date and time indicated on the invitation to bid may not be accepted unless the delay was due to an error of the contracting agency.

Correction or withdrawal of inadvertently erroneous bids before or after bid opening, or cancellation of awards or contracts based on bid mistakes may be permitted in accordance with regulations adopted by the commissioner. After bid opening, changes in bid prices or other provisions of bids prejudicial to the interest of the state or fair competition may not be permitted. Except as otherwise provided by regulation, a decision to permit the correction or withdrawal of a bid, or to cancel an award or contract based on bid mistake, shall be supported by a written determination made by the procurement officer. If a bidder is permitted to withdraw a bid before award, an action may not be maintained against the bidder or the bid security.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For competitive sealed bidding; multistep bidding, see 2 AAC 12, art. 3.

Collateral references. —

Right of bidder for state or municipal contract to rescind bid on ground that bid was based upon his own mistake or that of his employee.
2 ALR4th 991.

Application, to determination of government’s liability under public contract, of doctrine of “constructive” invocation of clause authorizing termination for convenience of government — modern cases. 104 ALR Fed. 661.

Sec. 36.30.170.
Contract award after bids.

After applying any preferences that apply under AS

36.15.050

and AS

36.30.321

—

36.30.338

, a procurement officer shall award a contract based on the solicited bids with reasonable promptness by written notice to the lowest responsible and responsive bidder whose bid conforms in all material respects to the requirements and criteria set out in the invitation to bid.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am §§ 7 — 9 ch 65 SLA 1987; am §§ 6, 18 ch 102 SLA 1989; am § 3 ch 175 SLA 1990; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 114 SLA 1992; am § 14 ch 137 SLA 1996; am §§ 1, 2 ch 53 SLA 1997; am § 33 ch 58 SLA 1999; am §§ 1, 2 ch 71 SLA 2000; am § 43 ch 56 SLA 2005; am § 26 ch 12 SLA 2006; am § 1 ch 45 SLA 2010; am § 12 ch 42 SLA 2013; am § 14 ch 59 SLA 2013)

Cross references. —

For current law relating to an Alaska bidder preference, see AS

36.30.321

.

For bidder preference provisions applicable to all insurance contracts involving state money, see AS

36.30.321

.

Opinions of attorney general. —

An agent will be considered the bidder only if the agent is in fact a principal with the power to convey a leasehold interest in its own right.
Otherwise, he is not entitled to the bidder preference.
July 1, 1989 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 36.30.175.
Alaska veterans’ preference. [Repealed, § 26 ch 59 SLA 2013. For current law, see AS 36.30.321.]

Sec. 36.30.180.
Purpose.

The legislature finds that there exists in the state continuing high unemployment, underutilization of resident construction and supply firms, and high costs unfavorable to the welfare of Alaskans and to the economic health of the state.
The purpose of bidder preference for resident firms when the state acts as a market participant is to encourage local industry, strengthen and stabilize the economy, decrease unemployment, and strengthen the tax and revenue base of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 70 SLA 1985)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

37.05.225

. Renumbered in 1988.

Sec. 36.30.190.
Multi-step sealed bidding.

When it is considered impractical to initially prepare a definitive purchase description to support an award based on price, the procurement officer may issue an invitation to bid requesting the submission of unpriced technical offers to be followed by an invitation to bid limited to the bidders whose offers are determined to be technically qualified under the criteria set out in the first solicitation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)